Louisiana, session 2026, SB248.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 18:531.1(A) and 531.1(A)(2) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 18:531.1(A)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§531.1. Exception Exceptions to opening polls; alternative voting locations
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the polling place for
a particular precinct shall not be required to be opened in either of the following
circumstances:
* * *
(2) When it is determined by the registrar of voters that there are fewer
than twenty voters eligible to vote in the voting district in the precinct, for any
office or proposition on the ballot, and the location of the precinct's polling
place serves as the polling place of another precinct where the remaining
eligible voters may vote pursuant to Subsection C of this Section.
(3) When it is determined by the registrar of voters after the close of early
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 248 ENROLLED
voting, that all voters eligible to vote in the precinct have voted absentee by mail or
during early voting.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.